Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1305
Carrier enforcement officers; uniform; badge.

When the carrier enforcement officers are on duty as such, they shall be dressed in a distinctive uniform and display a distinctive badge of office. The superintendent of the Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a distinctive badge of office, with a seal of this state in the center thereof and with the designation of the officer thereon. Every such badge shall be serially numbered.

Laws 1955, c. 145, § 5, p. 407;

Laws 1985, LB 395, § 6.